Utah statutes.
34A-8a-303.   Reemployment objectives.
(1)  The commission through the division shall administer this chapter with
the objective of assisting in returning a disabled injured worker to gainful
employment in the following order of employment priority:
(a)  same job, same employer;
(b)  modified job, same employer;
(c)  same job, new employer;
(d)  modified job, new employer;
(e)  new job, new employer; or
(f)  retraining in a new occupation.
(2)  Nothing in this chapter or its application is intended to:
(a)  modify or in any way affect an existing employee-employer relationship;
or
(b)  provide an employee with a guarantee or right to employment or continued
employment with an employer.
